District of Columbia statutes.
2-225.15

Repealed

Exchange of equipment in payment for new equipment.

Repealed.

June 26, 1912, 37 Stat. 147, ch. 182
April 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 409, 44 DCR 1423
1981 Ed., § 1-1124.
1973 Ed., § 1-819.